Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-911
Recreational Trails Fund; created; use.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Recreational Trails Fund. Federal funds advanced to the State of Nebraska through grants-in-aid under the provisions of Public Law 102-240, 102nd Congress, for approved projects shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The money in the fund shall be used by the Game and Parks Commission for the purposes of establishing recreational trails and trail-related projects pursuant to such public law.

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 52;

Laws 1996, LB 296, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.56;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 372.